Virginia statutes. Title 13.1. Corporations.
Article 17.1. Conversion to a Limited Liability Company.

§ 13.1-944.1.
Definitions.

In this article:

“Articles of organization”
has the same meaning specified in §

13.1-1002

.

“Converting entity”
means the domestic corporation that adopts a plan of entity conversion pursuant to this article.

“Corporation”
has the same meaning specified in §

13.1-803

.

“Limited liability company”
has the same meaning specified in §

13.1-1002

.

“LLC membership interest”
has the same meaning as membership interest in §

13.1-1002

.

“Member”
when used with respect to a corporation has the meaning as specified in §

13.1-803

, and when used with respect to a limited liability company has the same meaning specified in §

13.1-1002

.

“Membership interest”
has the same meaning specified in §

13.1-803

.

“Person”
has the same meaning specified in §

13.1-803

.

“Resulting entity”
means the limited liability company that is in existence immediately after consummation of an entity conversion pursuant to this article.

History.

2012, c. 706.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 487, cl. 3 provides: “That until July 1, 2023, the term ‘incorporation surrender’ when used in any provision of Chapter 10 (§

13.1-801

et seq.) of Title 13.1 of the Code of Virginia, the term ‘organization surrender’ when used in any provision of Chapter 12 (§

13.1-1000

et seq.) of Title 13.1 of the Code of Virginia, and the term ‘trust surrender’ when used in any provision of Chapter 14 (§

13.1-1200

et seq.) of Title 13.1 of the Code of Virginia shall also be construed to mean ‘domestication,’ and the term ‘entity conversion’ when used in any provision of Chapter 10, 12, or 14 of Title 13.1 of the Code of Virginia shall also be construed to mean ‘conversion.’ ”

Law Review.

For survey article, “Corporate and Business Law,” see 48 U. Rich. L. Rev. 39 (2013).

§ 13.1-944.2.
Entity conversion.

A domestic corporation may become a domestic limited liability company pursuant to a plan of entity conversion that is adopted and approved by the corporation in accordance with the provisions of this article.

History.

2012, c. 706; 2016, c. 288.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2016, c. 288, cl. 3 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall not affect the validity of any filing made, or other action taken, before the effective date of this act with respect to (i) the conversion of a domestic or foreign partnership or limited partnership to a limited liability company or (ii) the domestication of a non-United States entity as a limited liability company.”

The 2016 amendments.

The 2016 amendment by c. 288 inserted “domestic” twice and substituted “that is” for “Such a plan shall be” and “provisions” for “procedures.”

§ 13.1-944.3.
Plan of entity conversion.

To become a domestic limited liability company, a domestic corporation shall adopt a plan of entity conversion setting forth:

A statement of the corporation’s intention to convert to a limited liability company;

The terms and conditions of the conversion, including the manner and basis of converting the membership interests, if any, of the corporation into LLC membership interests of the resulting entity;

If the corporation has no members, the designation of each person who is to become a member of the limited liability company upon conversion, provided that no person shall be designated as a member of the resulting entity without the person’s prior consent;

As a separate attachment to the plan, the full text of the articles of organization of the resulting entity as they will be in effect upon consummation of the conversion; and

Any other provision relating to the conversion that may be desired.

The plan of entity conversion may also include a provision that the board of directors may amend the plan before the effective time and date of the certificate of entity conversion. An amendment made after the submission of the plan to the members shall not alter or change any of the terms or conditions of the plan if the change would adversely affect the membership interests of the corporation, unless the amendment has been approved by the members in the manner set forth in §

13.1-944.4

.

History.

2012, c. 706; 2016, c. 288.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2016, c. 288, cl. 3 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall not affect the validity of any filing made, or other action taken, before the effective date of this act with respect to (i) the conversion of a domestic or foreign partnership or limited partnership to a limited liability company or (ii) the domestication of a non-United States entity as a limited liability company.”

The 2016 amendments.

The 2016 amendment by c. 288, in subsection A, inserted “To become a domestic limited liability company, a domestic corporation shall adopt” and substituted “setting” for “shall set”; added subdivision A 1 and renumbered remaining subdivisions accordingly; in subdivision A 3, substituted “If” for “Where,” “designation of each person who is” for “plan of entity conversion shall provide for the designation of the persons who are” and “provided that no” for “No”; in subdivision A 4, substituted “upon” for “immediately after”; in subsection B, substituted “before the effective time and date” for “prior to the issuance” in the first sentence and substituted “after” for “subsequent to” and inserted “unless the amendment has been approved by the members in the manner set forth in §

13.1-944.4

” in the second sentence.

§ 13.1-944.4.
Action on plan of entity conversion.

Where the corporation has no members, or no members having voting rights, the plan shall be adopted upon receiving the vote of at least two-thirds of the directors in office.

Where there are members of the corporation having voting rights:

The plan of entity conversion shall be adopted by the board of directors;

After adopting the plan of entity conversion, the board of directors shall submit the plan to the members for their approval. The board of directors shall also transmit to the members a recommendation that the members approve the plan, unless the board of directors determines that because of conflicts of interest or other special circumstances it should not make such a recommendation, in which case the board of directors shall transmit to the members the basis for that determination; and

The voting members shall approve the plan as provided in subdivision C 3.

When a plan of entity conversion is to be approved by the members in accordance with subsection B:

The board of directors may condition its submission of the plan of entity conversion to the members on any basis;

The corporation shall notify each member, whether or not entitled to vote, of the proposed members’ meeting in accordance with §

13.1-842

at which the plan of entity conversion is to be submitted for approval. The notice shall also state that the purpose, or one of the purposes, of the meeting is to consider the plan and shall contain or be accompanied by a copy of the plan; and

Unless this chapter or the board of directors, acting pursuant to subdivision 1, requires a greater vote, the plan of entity conversion shall be approved by each voting group entitled to vote on the plan by more than two-thirds of all the votes entitled to be cast by that voting group. The articles of incorporation may provide for a greater or lesser vote than that provided for in this subsection or a vote by separate voting groups so long as the vote provided for is not less than a majority of all the votes cast on the plan by each voting group entitled to vote on the plan at a meeting at which a quorum of the voting group exists.

History.

2012, c. 706.

§ 13.1-944.5.
Articles of entity conversion.

After the plan of entity conversion of a corporation into a limited liability company has been adopted and approved as required by this article, the converting entity shall deliver to the Commission for filing articles of entity conversion setting forth:

The name of the corporation immediately before the filing of the articles of entity conversion and the name to which the name of the converting entity is to be changed, which name shall satisfy the requirements of the laws of the Commonwealth;

The date on which the corporation was originally incorporated, organized, or formed; its original name, entity type, and jurisdiction of incorporation, organization, or formation; and, for each subsequent change of entity type or jurisdiction of incorporation, organization, or formation made before the filing of the articles of entity conversion, the effective date of the change and the corporation’s name, entity type, and jurisdiction of incorporation, organization, or formation upon consummation of the change;

The plan of entity conversion, including the full text of the articles of organization of the resulting entity that comply with the requirements of Chapter 12 (§

13.1-1000

et seq.), as they will be in effect upon consummation of the conversion;

The date the plan of entity conversion was approved; and

A statement:

That the plan was adopted by the vote of at least two-thirds of the directors in office, including the reason member approval was not required;

That the plan was adopted by the unanimous consent of the members having voting rights; or

That the plan was proposed by the board of directors and submitted to the members in accordance with this chapter, and a statement of:

The existence of a quorum of each voting group entitled to vote separately on the plan; and

Either the total number of votes cast for and against the plan by each voting group entitled to vote separately on the plan or the total number of undisputed votes cast for the plan separately by each voting group and a statement that the number cast for the plan by each voting group was sufficient for approval by that voting group.

If the Commission finds that the articles of entity conversion comply with the requirements of law and that all required fees have been paid, it shall issue a certificate of entity conversion.

History.

2012, c. 706; 2015, c. 623; 2016, c. 288.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2016, c. 288, cl. 3 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall not affect the validity of any filing made, or other action taken, before the effective date of this act with respect to (i) the conversion of a domestic or foreign partnership or limited partnership to a limited liability company or (ii) the domestication of a non-United States entity as a limited liability company.”

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendment by c. 623 inserted “in office” following “directors” in subdivision A 3 a.

The 2016 amendments.

The 2016 amendment by c. 288, in subsection A, inserted “plan of entity” and substituted “deliver to the Commission for filing” for “file with the Commission”; in subdivision A 1, substituted “before” for “prior to”; added subdivisions A 2 and A 4 and renumbered remaining subdivisions accordingly; and in subdivision A 3, substituted “upon” for “immediately after.”

§ 13.1-944.6.
Effect of entity conversion.

When an entity conversion under this article becomes effective, with respect to that entity:

The title to all real estate and other property remains in the resulting entity without reversion or impairment;

The liabilities remain the liabilities of the resulting entity;

A pending proceeding may be continued by or against the resulting entity as if the conversion did not occur;

The articles of organization attached to the articles of entity conversion constitute the articles of organization of the resulting entity;

The membership interests, if any, of the corporation are reclassified into LLC membership interests in accordance with the plan of entity conversion, and the members of the converting entity are entitled only to the rights provided in the plan of entity conversion;

The resulting entity is deemed to:

Be a limited liability company for all purposes;

Be the same entity without interruption as the converting entity that existed before the conversion; and

Have been organized on the date that the converting entity was originally incorporated, organized, or formed; and

The corporation shall cease to be a corporation when the certificate of entity conversion becomes effective.

Any member of a converting entity who, before the conversion, was liable for the liabilities or obligations of the converting entity is not released from those liabilities or obligations by reason of the conversion.

History.

2012, c. 706; 2015, c. 623; 2016, c. 288.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2016, c. 288, cl. 3 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall not affect the validity of any filing made, or other action taken, before the effective date of this act with respect to (i) the conversion of a domestic or foreign partnership or limited partnership to a limited liability company or (ii) the domestication of a non-United States entity as a limited liability company.”

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendment by c. 623 added the subsection A designation; in subdivision A 3, substituted “pending proceeding” for “proceeding pending”; and added subsection B.

The 2016 amendments.

The 2016 amendment by c. 288, in subdivision A 5, substituted “converting entity” for “corporation”; in subdivision A 6 b, substituted “before” for “prior to”; in subdivision A 6 c, inserted “organized, or formed”; in subsection B, substituted “converting entity who, before” for “corporation that converts to a limited liability company who, prior to” and “converting entity” for “limited liability company” and deleted “entity” following “obligations by reason of the.”

§ 13.1-944.7.
Abandonment of entity conversion.

Unless otherwise provided in the plan of entity conversion, after a plan of entity conversion has been adopted and approved by the converting domestic corporation in the manner as required by this article, and at any time before the certificate of entity conversion has become effective, the plan may be abandoned by the corporation without action by its members in accordance with any procedures set forth in the plan or, if no procedures are set forth in the plan, in the manner determined by the board of directors.

If an entity conversion is abandoned after articles of entity conversion have been filed with the Commission but before the certificate of entity conversion has become effective, a statement of abandonment shall be signed on behalf of the converting domestic corporation and delivered to the Commission for filing before the effective time and date of the certificate of entity conversion. If the Commission finds that the statement of abandonment complies with the requirements of law, it shall issue a certificate of abandonment, effective as of the date and time the statement was received by the Commission, and the entity conversion shall be deemed abandoned and shall not become effective.

The statement of abandonment shall contain:

The name of the converting domestic corporation;

The name of the converted entity set forth in the articles of entity conversion;

The date on which the articles of conversion were filed with the Commission;

The date and time on which the Commission’s certificate of entity conversion becomes effective; and

A statement that the entity conversion is being abandoned in accordance with this section.

History.

2012, c. 706; 2015, c. 623; 2016, c. 288; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 487.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2016, c. 288, cl. 3 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall not affect the validity of any filing made, or other action taken, before the effective date of this act with respect to (i) the conversion of a domestic or foreign partnership or limited partnership to a limited liability company or (ii) the domestication of a non-United States entity as a limited liability company.”

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 487, cl. 4 provides: “That the provisions of this act (i) shall be applied prospectively only; (ii) shall not affect the validity of any filing made, or other action taken, prior to July 1, 2021, with respect to the name of a stock corporation, nonstock corporation, limited liability company, business trust, or limited partnership; and (iii) shall not be construed to require any such stock corporation, nonstock corporation, limited liability company, business trust, or limited partnership that was in compliance with applicable laws regarding the distinguishability of its name prior to July 1, 2021, to change its name or take other action to comply with the requirements of this act.”

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendment by c. 623 rewrote subsection A and inserted “time and” preceding “date” in subsection B.

The 2016 amendments.

The 2016 amendments by c. 288, in subsection A, deleted “of entity conversion” following “set forth in the plan,” and “such” preceding “procedures are set forth”; in subsection B, substituted “a statement” for “written notice,” “delivered to the Commission for filing before” for “filed with the Commission prior to,” and “Upon filing, the statement shall take effect” for “The notice shall take effect upon filing.”

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 487, effective July 1, 2021, rewrote subsections A and B; and added subsection C. For applicability clause, see Editor’s note.